Massachusetts, session 194th, H1560.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 68. In order to meet the housing needs of the Commonwealth, there is hereby
established a statewide goal of producing 400,000 new units of housing in Massachusetts by
2040. The housing production goal shall also include a goal of having 80,000 units of housing
created by 2040 that are affordable to households earning less than 80% of the Area Median
Income, with at least 20,000 of these affordable units for households earning less than 60 percent
of the Area Median Income, and 20,000 supportive housing units for households earning less
than 30% of the Area Median Income.
The secretary of housing and liveable communities shall report annually to the clerks of
the house of representatives and the senate, who shall forward the report to the house of
representatives and the senate, the chairs of the joint committee on housing, and the chairs of the
senate and house committee on ways and means, on progress made towards meeting these
of 2

housing production goals. The report shall include a breakdown of market-rate units created;
units created that are accessible or adaptable for persons with disabilities; units created for
persons over the age of 55; and units created by deed restricted affordable housing available to
households earning less than 80% Area Median Income, less than 60% Area Median Income,
less than 30% Area Median Income, and number of supportive housing units. The secretary of
housing and livable communities shall also report annually on the number of residential
properties purchased by foreign buyers in Massachusetts. As part of the report, the secretary of
housing and liveable communities shall also include information on short term rentals collected
as required by Chapter 337 of the Acts of 2020.
of 2